Utah statutes.
31A-36-103.   Law governing.
(1)  If there is more than one owner on a single policy and the owners are
residents of different states, the law of the state in which the owner having
the largest percentage ownership resides governs the life settlement.  If the
owners own equal fractions of a policy, the owners may agree in writing that
the law of the state in which one resides governs the life settlement.
(2)  A life settlement that is subject to this chapter may not:
(a)  require that the life settlement be construed according to the laws of
another jurisdiction; or
(b)  deprive a court of competent jurisdiction in Utah to have jurisdiction
over an action.
